Arkansas, session 2025, HB1127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Education - Arkansas State Library for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U031U STATE LIBRARY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) N161N STATE LIBRARY DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(3) E012C STATE LIBRARY DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(4) E021C STATE LIBRARY MANAGER 8 GRADE GS09
(5) E030C LIBRARY COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS08
(6) E041C SENIOR LIBRARIAN 7 GRADE GS07
*KMW007*
01/14/2025 4:03:19 PM KMW007

HB1127
(7) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(8) E052C LIBRARIAN 3 GRADE GS06
(9) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(10) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
(11) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(12) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(13) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
(14) C069C LIBRARY TECHNICIAN 4 GRADE GS03
(15) C085C LIBRARY SUPPORT ASSISTANT 3 GRADE GS02
(16) C089C LIBRARY TECHNICAL ASSISTANT 2 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 43

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Education - Arkansas State Library - State Operations
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: seven (7) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the State
Library Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Education - Arkansas State Library - State Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,677,479
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 631,344
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,125,091
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
01/14/2025 4:03:19 PM KMW007

HB1127
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) BOOKS & SUBSCRIPTIONS 230,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,683,914

SECTION 4. EXTRA HELP - FEDERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Education - Arkansas State Library -
Federal Operations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five (5) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the federal
funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Education - Arkansas
State Library - Federal Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $458,899
(02) EXTRA HELP 22,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 194,756
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,347,700
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 145,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 10,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,178,355

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - AID TO PUBLIC LIBRARIES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the State
01/14/2025 4:03:19 PM KMW007

HB1127
Library Public School Fund Account, to provide aid to public libraries by the
Department of Education - Arkansas State Library - Aid to Public Libraries
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AID TO PUBLIC LIBRARIES $6,500,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS ADMINISTRATION - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Education -
Arkansas State Library - Grants Administration - Cash for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $20,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $40,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - STATE LIBRARY REVOLVING. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the State
Library Revolving Fund, for operating expenses of the Department of Education
- Arkansas State Library - State Library Revolving for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
01/14/2025 4:03:19 PM KMW007

HB1127
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $500

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD. At the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025,
any unexpended balance of monies provided from the State Library Fund Account
for Books and Subscriptions, as provided in the State Operations
Appropriation of this Act, shall be transferred forward and made available
for the same purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein,
may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement
set forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a
written report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
include all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals
and/or a statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution.
01/14/2025 4:03:19 PM KMW007

HB1127
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. STATE
FUNDING FOR LIBRARIES PROVISIONS.
(i) The Department of Education – Arkansas State Library provides
grants and aid to Libraries across the state. The Arkansas State Library
has developed the Standards for State Aid to public libraries which creates
standards public libraries must meet to be eligible for state aid.
(ii) The Standards for State Aid to Public Libraries contains the
requirement that a public library shall maintain a one-mill county or city
property tax, and the requirement that the library have a qualified
librarian.
(iii) Less populated areas in the State may not have the ability to
pass and maintain a one-mill county or city property tax.
(iv) Due to the importance that the public library represents to rural
communities, the Arkansas State Library shall review and modify the
requirements that prevent rural public libraries from receiving state grant
and aid that is authorized by the General Assembly, as set out in subsection
(v).
(v) Therefore, the Arkansas State Library shall promulgate rules that
allow a public library to adequately demonstrate a source of revenue in lieu
of the requirement to maintain a one-mill county or city property tax.
(vi) One month prior to the distribution of state aid to public
libraries for the 2025 2026 Fiscal Year, the Arkansas State Library shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, if
meeting in legislative session, the revised Standards for State Aid to Public
Libraries which shall address in writing the actions taken to address the
issues as set out in this section. The report shall include all criteria,
including but not limited to how a local public library may become certified
to receive funding from the Arkansas State Library.
(vii) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July
1, 2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
01/14/2025 4:03:19 PM KMW007

HB1127
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 12. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 13. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.







01/14/2025 4:03:19 PM KMW007